fr: Degré de fermeté de la pâte polymère: Ferme; Moyen; Souple; Très ferme; Très souple; Autre
fi: Polymeerisaven kovuusaste: Kiinteä; Keskikova; Pehmeä; Erittäin kiinteä; Erittäin pehmeä; Muu
nl: Polymeerklei stevigheidsniveau: Stevig; Medium; Zacht; Zeer stevig; Zeer zacht; Overig
pt-PT: Nível de firmeza da argila polimérica: Firme; Médio; Macio; Muito firme; Muito macio; Outro
th: ระดับความแข็งของดินโพลิเมอร์: แข็ง; ปานกลาง; นุ่ม; แข็งมาก; นุ่มมาก; อื่นๆ
ja: ポリマークレイの硬さレベル: 硬め; 普通; 柔らかめ; かなり硬め; かなり柔らかめ; その他
pl: Poziom twardości glinki polimerowej: Twarda; Średnia; Miękka; Bardzo twarda; Bardzo miękka; Inne
vi: Độ cứng của đất sét polymer: Cứng; Trung bình; Mềm; Rất cứng; Rất mềm; Khác
tr: Polimer kil sertlik seviyesi: Sert; Orta; Yumuşak; Çok sert; Çok yumuşak; Diğer
zh-TW: 聚合物黏土硬度等級: 堅硬; 中等; 柔軟; 非常堅硬; 非常柔軟; 其他
pt-BR: Argila polimérica nível de firmeza: Firme; Média; Macia; Muito firme; Muito macia; Outros
lt-LT: Polimerinio molio kietumo lygis: Kietas; Vidutinis; Minkštas; Labai kietas; Labai minkštas; Kita
de: Festigkeitsgrad der Polymerknete: Fest; Mittel; Weich; Sehr fest; Sehr weich; Sonstige
el: Βαθμός σκληρότητας του πολυμερούς πηλού: Σκληρό; Μέτριο; Μαλακό; Πολύ σκληρό; Πολύ μαλακό; Άλλο
ro-RO: Nivelul de fermitate al argilei polimerice: Fermă; Medie; Moale; Foarte fermă; Foarte moale; Altele
it: Livello di consistenza dell'argilla polimerica: Solido; Medio; Morbido; Molto solido; Molto morbido; Altro
zh-CN: 软陶硬度等级: 硬; 中等; 软; 非常硬; 非常软; 其他
cs: Stupeň pevnosti polymerové hmoty: Tvrdá; Střední; Měkká; Velmi tvrdá; Velmi měkká; Jiné
hr-HR: Stupanj čvrstoće polimerne gline: Čvrsta; Srednje; Mekana; Vrlo čvrsta; Vrlo mekana; Ostalo
da: Polymerlers fasthedsniveau: Fast; Medium; Blød; Meget fast; Meget blød; Andet
ru: Степень жесткости полимерной глины: Твердая; Средняя; Мягкая; Очень твердая; Очень мягкая; Другое
sv: Polymerleras fasthetsnivå: Fast; Medium; Mjuk; Mycket fast; Mycket mjuk; Annat
sk-SK: Stupeň pevnosti polymérnej hliny: Pevná; Stredná; Mäkká; Veľmi pevná; Veľmi mäkká; Iné
hu: Polimer gyurma keménységi szintje: Kemény; Közepes; Lágy; Nagyon kemény; Nagyon lágy; Egyéb
en: Polymer clay firmness level: Firm; Medium; Soft; Very firm; Very soft; Other
ko: 폴리머 클레이의 경도 수준: 단단함; 보통; 부드러움; 매우 단단함; 매우 부드러움; 기타
nb: Polymerleire – fasthetsnivå: Fast; Medium; Myk; Veldig fast; Veldig myk; Annet
sl-SI: Stopnja trdote polimerne mase: Čvrsto; Srednje; Mehko; Zelo čvrsto; Zelo mehko; Drugo
es: Nivel de firmeza de la arcilla polimérica: Firme; Medio; Blando; Muy firme; Muy blando; Otro
bg-BG: Ниво на твърдост на полимерната глина: Твърда; Средна; Мека; Много твърда; Много мека; Други